Utah statutes.
16-16-515.   Manner of voting.

(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, voting by a proxy at a members meeting is prohibited.  This Subsection (1) does not prohibit delegate voting based on district or class.

(2)  If voting by a proxy is permitted, a patron member may appoint only another patron member as a proxy and, if investor members are permitted, an investor member may appoint only another investor member as a proxy.

(3)  The organic rules may provide for the manner of and provisions governing the appointment of a proxy.

(4)  The organic rules may provide for voting on any question by ballot delivered by mail or voting by other means on questions that are subject to vote by members.

